vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX wB Y 43
SFX wB indre indre/ indre
SFX wB indre ignant/ indre
SFX wB indre int/ indre
SFX wB indre ints/ indre
SFX wB indre inte/ indre
SFX wB indre intes/ indre
SFX wB indre ins/ indre
SFX wB indre int/ indre
SFX wB indre ignons/ indre
SFX wB indre ignez/ indre
SFX wB indre ignent/ indre
SFX wB indre ignais/ indre
SFX wB indre ignait/ indre
SFX wB indre ignions/ indre
SFX wB indre igniez/ indre
SFX wB indre ignaient/ indre
SFX wB indre ignis/ indre
SFX wB indre ignit/ indre
SFX wB indre ignîmes/ indre
SFX wB indre ignîtes/ indre
SFX wB indre ignirent/ indre
SFX wB indre indrai/ indre
SFX wB indre indras/ indre
SFX wB indre indra/ indre
SFX wB indre indrons/ indre
SFX wB indre indrez/ indre
SFX wB indre indront/ indre
SFX wB indre indrais/ indre
SFX wB indre indrait/ indre
SFX wB indre indrions/ indre
SFX wB indre indriez/ indre
SFX wB indre indraient/ indre
SFX wB indre igne/ indre
SFX wB indre ignes/ indre
SFX wB indre ignisse/ indre
SFX wB indre ignisses/ indre
SFX wB indre ignît/ indre
SFX wB indre ignissions/ indre
SFX wB indre ignissiez/ indre
SFX wB indre ignissent/ indre
SFX wB indre ins/ indre
SFX wB indre ignons/ indre
SFX wB indre ignez/ indre

SFX wD Y 46
SFX wD aire aire/ faire
SFX wD aire aisant/ faire
SFX wD aire ait/ faire
SFX wD aire aits/ faire
SFX wD aire aite/ faire
SFX wD aire aites/ faire
SFX wD aire ais/ faire
SFX wD aire ait/ faire
SFX wD aire aisons/ faire
SFX wD aire aites/ faire
SFX wD aire ont/ faire
SFX wD aire aisais/ faire
SFX wD aire aisait/ faire
SFX wD aire aisions/ faire
SFX wD aire aisiez/ faire
SFX wD aire aisaient/ faire
SFX wD aire is/ faire
SFX wD aire it/ faire
SFX wD aire îmes/ faire
SFX wD aire îtes/ faire
SFX wD aire irent/ faire
SFX wD aire erai/ faire
SFX wD aire eras/ faire
SFX wD aire era/ faire
SFX wD aire erons/ faire
SFX wD aire erez/ faire
SFX wD aire eront/ faire
SFX wD aire erais/ faire
SFX wD aire erait/ faire
SFX wD aire erions/ faire
SFX wD aire eriez/ faire
SFX wD aire eraient/ faire
SFX wD aire asse/ faire
SFX wD aire asses/ faire
SFX wD aire assions/ faire
SFX wD aire assiez/ faire
SFX wD aire assent/ faire
SFX wD aire isse/ faire
SFX wD aire isses/ faire
SFX wD aire ît/ faire
SFX wD aire issions/ faire
SFX wD aire issiez/ faire
SFX wD aire issent/ faire
SFX wD aire ais/ faire
SFX wD aire aisons/ faire
SFX wD aire aites/ faire

SFX wF Y 14
SFX wF faire faire/ faire
SFX wF faire faisant/ faire
SFX wF faire fait/ faire
SFX wF faire faits/ faire
SFX wF faire faite/ faire
SFX wF faire faites/ faire
SFX wF faire fais/ faire
SFX wF faire fait/ faire
SFX wF faire faisons/ faire
SFX wF faire faites/ faire
SFX wF faire font/ faire
SFX wF faire fais/ faire
SFX wF faire faisons/ faire
SFX wF faire faites/ faire

SFX wG Y 6
SFX wG aire aire/ faire
SFX wG aire aisant/ faire
SFX wG aire ait/ faire
SFX wG aire aits/ faire
SFX wG aire aite/ faire
SFX wG aire aites/ faire

SFX wL Y 32
SFX wL raire raire/ traire
SFX wL raire rayant/ traire
SFX wL raire rait/ traire
SFX wL raire raits/ traire
SFX wL raire raite/ traire
SFX wL raire raites/ traire
SFX wL raire rais/ traire
SFX wL raire rait/ traire
SFX wL raire rayons/ traire
SFX wL raire rayez/ traire
SFX wL raire raient/ traire
SFX wL raire rayais/ traire
SFX wL raire rayait/ traire
SFX wL raire rayions/ traire
SFX wL raire rayiez/ traire
SFX wL raire rayaient/ traire
SFX wL raire rairai/ traire
SFX wL raire rairas/ traire
SFX wL raire raira/ traire
SFX wL raire rairons/ traire
SFX wL raire rairez/ traire
SFX wL raire rairont/ traire
SFX wL raire rairais/ traire
SFX wL raire rairait/ traire
SFX wL raire rairions/ traire
SFX wL raire rairiez/ traire
SFX wL raire rairaient/ traire
SFX wL raire raie/ traire
SFX wL raire raies/ traire
SFX wL raire rais/ traire
SFX wL raire rayons/ traire
SFX wL raire rayez/ traire

SFX wM Y 29
SFX wM aire aire/ raire
SFX wM aire ayant/ raire
SFX wM aire ait/ raire
SFX wM aire ais/ raire
SFX wM aire ait/ raire
SFX wM aire ayons/ raire
SFX wM aire ayez/ raire
SFX wM aire aient/ raire
SFX wM aire ayais/ raire
SFX wM aire ayait/ raire
SFX wM aire ayions/ raire
SFX wM aire ayiez/ raire
SFX wM aire ayaient/ raire
SFX wM aire airai/ raire
SFX wM aire airas/ raire
SFX wM aire aira/ raire
SFX wM aire airons/ raire
SFX wM aire airez/ raire
SFX wM aire airont/ raire
SFX wM aire airais/ raire
SFX wM aire airait/ raire
SFX wM aire airions/ raire
SFX wM aire airiez/ raire
SFX wM aire airaient/ raire
SFX wM aire aie/ raire
SFX wM aire aies/ raire
SFX wM aire ais/ raire
SFX wM aire ayons/ raire
SFX wM aire ayez/ raire

SFX wN Y 41
SFX wN aire aire/ aire
SFX wN aire aisant/ aire
SFX wN aire ais/ aire
SFX wN aire ait/ taire
SFX wN aire aît/ plaire
SFX wN aire ait/ plaire
SFX wN aire aisons/ aire
SFX wN aire aisez/ aire
SFX wN aire aisent/ aire
SFX wN aire aisais/ aire
SFX wN aire aisait/ aire
SFX wN aire aisions/ aire
SFX wN aire aisiez/ aire
SFX wN aire aisaient/ aire
SFX wN aire us/ aire
SFX wN aire ut/ aire
SFX wN aire ûmes/ aire
SFX wN aire ûtes/ aire
SFX wN aire urent/ aire
SFX wN aire airai/ aire
SFX wN aire airas/ aire
SFX wN aire aira/ aire
SFX wN aire airons/ aire
SFX wN aire airez/ aire
SFX wN aire airont/ aire
SFX wN aire airais/ aire
SFX wN aire airait/ aire
SFX wN aire airions/ aire
SFX wN aire airiez/ aire
SFX wN aire airaient/ aire
SFX wN aire aise/ aire
SFX wN aire aises/ aire
SFX wN aire usse/ aire
SFX wN aire usses/ aire
SFX wN aire ût/ aire
SFX wN aire ussions/ aire
SFX wN aire ussiez/ aire
SFX wN aire ussent/ aire
SFX wN aire ais/ aire
SFX wN aire aisons/ aire
SFX wN aire aisez/ aire

SFX wO Y 43
SFX wO aindre aindre/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignant/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aint/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aints/ aindre
SFX wO aindre ainte/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aintes/ aindre
SFX wO aindre ains/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aint/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignons/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignez/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignent/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignais/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignait/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignions/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aigniez/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignaient/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignis/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignit/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignîmes/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignîtes/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignirent/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrai/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindras/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindra/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrons/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrez/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindront/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrais/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrait/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindrions/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindriez/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aindraient/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aigne/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignes/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignisse/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignisses/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignît/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignissions/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignissiez/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignissent/ aindre
SFX wO aindre ains/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignons/ aindre
SFX wO aindre aignez/ aindre
