vim/st.dic
abstraire/wL
adjoindre/wB
astreindre/wB
atteindre/wB
aveindre/wB
braire/wM
ceindre/wB
complaire/wNq.
conjoindre/wB
contraindre/wO
contrefaire/wD
craindre/wO
défaire/wD
dépeindre/wB
déplaire/wNq.
déteindre/wB
disjoindre/wB
distraire/wL
empreindre/wB
enceindre/wB
enfreindre/wB
enjoindre/wB
éteindre/wB
étreindre/wB
extraire/wL
faire/wD
feindre/wB
forfaire/wF
joindre/wB
malfaire/wD
méfaire/wD
oindre/wB
parfaire/wD
peindre/wB
plaindre/wO
plaire/wNq.
poindre/wB
raire/wM
redéfaire/wD
refaire/wD
rejoindre/wB
repeindre/wB
restreindre/wB
reteindre/wB
retraire/wL
satisfaire/wD
soustraire/wL
stupéfaire/wG
surfaire/wD
taire/wNq+
teindre/wB
traire/wL
